District of Columbia statutes.
29-707.02

Transfer of partner’s transferable interest.

(a)

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner’s transferable interest:

(1)

Is permissible;

(2)

Shall not by itself cause the partner’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities and affairs; and

(3)

Shall not, as against the other partners or the limited partnership, entitle the transferee to participate in the management or conduct of the limited partnership’s activities and affairs, to require access to information concerning the limited partnership’s transactions except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, or to inspect or copy the required information or the limited partnership’s other records.

(b)

A transferee shall have a right to receive, in accordance with the transfer:

(1)

Distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled; and

(2)

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities and affairs, the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor.

(c)

In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee shall be entitled to an account of the limited partnership’s transactions only from the date of dissolution.

(d)

Upon transfer, the transferor retain the rights of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred and shall retain all duties and obligations of a partner.

(e)

A limited partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the limited partnership has notice of the transfer.

(f)

A transfer of a partner’s transferable interest in the limited partnership in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement shall be ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

(g)

A transferee that becomes a partner with respect to a transferable interest shall be liable for the transferor’s obligations under §§ 29-705.02 and 29-705.09. However, the transferee shall not be obligated for liabilities unknown to the transferee at the time the transferee became a partner.

(h)

A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by a limited partnership in a record, and, subject to this section, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(8)(B), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-707.03 and § 29-707.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (a)(2), (a)(3), and (b)(2); and added (h).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 702 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.